Utah statutes.
76-10-906.   Unfair discrimination by buyer of milk, cream or butterfat -- Classification of offense.

Any person doing business in this state and engaged in the business of buying milk, cream, or butterfat for the purpose of sale or storage, who, for the purpose of creating a monopoly or destroying the business of a competitor, discriminates between different sections, communities, localities, cities, or towns of this state by purchasing the commodity or commodities at a higher price or rate in one section, community, location, city, or town than is paid for the same commodity by the person in another section, community, locality, city, or town, after making due allowance for the difference, if any, in the grade or quality, and in the actual cost of transportation from the point of purchase to the point of manufacture, sale, or storage, is guilty of unfair discrimination, which is hereby prohibited and declared to be unlawful; and any person, firm, company, association, or corporation, or any officer, agent, receiver, or member of such firm, company, association, or corporation, found guilty of unfair discrimination as herein defined shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

